New York, session 2025-2026, A10693.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 1262-s of the tax law, as amended by chapter 220 of 2 the laws of 2025, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 1262-s. Disposition of net collections from the additional one-quar- 4 ter of one percent rate of sales and compensating use taxes in the coun- 5 ty of Herkimer. Notwithstanding any contrary provision of law, if the 6 county of Herkimer imposes the additional one-quarter of one percent 7 rate of sales and compensating use taxes authorized by section twelve 8 hundred ten-E of this article for all or any portion of the period 9 beginning December first, two thousand seven and ending November thirti- 10 eth, two thousand twenty-seven, the county shall use all net collections 11 from such additional one-quarter of one percent rate to pay the county's 12 expenses for the construction of additional correctional facilities. The 13 net collections from the additional rate imposed pursuant to section 14 twelve hundred ten-E of this article [shall be deposited in a special 15 fund to be created by such county separate and apart from any other 16 funds and accounts of the county. Any and all remaining net collections 17 from such additional tax, after the expenses of such construction are 18 paid,] shall be deposited by the county of Herkimer in the general fund 19 of such county for any county purpose. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15190-01-6